Utah statutes.
53A-24-106.   Public funding of vocational rehabilitation and independent living rehabilitation services.

(1)  Public funding of vocational rehabilitation and independent living rehabilitation services may only be provided to eligible individuals who are found to require financial assistance with respect to those services.

(2)  The executive director may establish priorities for use in determining services to be provided to eligible individuals under this chapter if the demand for services exceeds available funds.

(3)  Rights established under this chapter are not transferable or assignable.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 83, 1988 General Session

